Maine, session 132, LD1146.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §651, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 157, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. The actor intentionally or knowingly threatens to use force against any person
present or otherwise intentionally or knowingly places any person present in fear of the
imminent use of force with the intent:
(1) To prevent or overcome resistance to the taking of the property, or to the
retention of the property immediately after the taking; or
(2) To compel the person in control of the property to give it up or to engage in
other conduct that aids in the taking or carrying away of the property.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class B crime;
Page 1 - 132LR0511(03)